Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB83.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 237 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) As used in this section, "red flag law" means a law under which a person may
petition a court to temporarily take away another person's right to possess a
firearm which the respondent may otherwise lawfully possess under the laws of
this Commonwealth.
(2) A police department, law enforcement agency, or officer of the Commonwealth
shall not enforce an order under a red flag law when the person against whom
the order is directed has the lawful right under the laws of this Commonwealth to
possess firearms.
(3) A court shall not issue an order under any red flag law to deprive a citizen of this
Commonwealth of his or her right to possess firearms, firearms accessories, or
ammunition.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 1/3/2025 3:17 PM Jacketed